Utah statutes.
63A-9-701.   Subscription to motor pool by certain local government
entities.
(1)  The following local government entities may subscribe to the central
motor pool service provided by the division subject to the conditions
established in Subsection (2):
(a)  local health departments as defined in Title 26A, Chapter 1, Part 1,
Local Health Department Act;
(b)  local substance abuse authorities as defined in Section 17-43-201;
(c)  local area agencies, as authorized by Section 62A-3-104, or their
subcontractors who are local governmental or public entities; and
(d)  local mental health authorities as defined in Section 17-43-301.
(2)  The local government entities outlined in Subsection (1) may subscribe to
the central motor pool service provided by the division only if:
(a)  the director of the local government entity determines it will result in
substantial cost savings or increased efficiency to the local government
entity; and
(b)  the central motor pool has sufficient vehicles available.
